District of Columbia statutes.
20-905

Manner of presentation of claim.

(a)

A claimant shall present a claim against a decedent’s estate by delivering or mailing, return receipt requested, a written statement of the claim, verified in accordance with section 20-102:

(1)

to the personal representative with a copy to the Register; or

(2)

to the Register with a copy to the personal representative.

For purposes of presenting a claim within the 6-month time limits provided in section 20-903 , a claim shall be deemed presented if inadvertently it is only sent either to the personal representative or to the Register pursuant to this section.

(b)

A statement of a claim shall state:

(1)

the name and address of the claimant;

(2)

the basis of the claim;

(3)

the amount claimed;

(4)

if the claim is not yet due, when the claim will become due;

(5)

if the claim is contingent, the nature of the contingency; and

(6)

if the claim is secured, a description of the security.

(c)

The Court may, in its discretion, disallow a claim, in whole or in part, if the claimant fails to comply with subsections (a) and (b) or with the personal representative’s reasonable requests for additional information.

June 24, 1980, D.C. Law 3-72, § 101, 27 DCR 2155
Mar. 21, 1995, D.C. Law 10-241, § 3(fff), 42 DCR 63
This section is referenced in § 20-343, § 20-903, § 20-908, and § 20-910.
1981 Ed., § 20-905.
For temporary amendment of § 4 of D.C. Law 10-241, see § 2 of the Probate Reform Act of 1994 Emergency Amendment Act of 1995 (D.C. Act 11-79, June 28, 1995, 42 DCR 3452).
Application of Law 10-241: Section 4 of D.C. Law 10-241, as amended by § 2 of D.C. Law 11-54, provided that the act shall be applicable to estates of decedents who died on or after July 1, 1995.